Florida, session 2026, SB1520.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âParagraph (o) of subsection (3) of section 14 196.1978, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 15 196.1978âAffordable housing property exemption.â 16 (3) 17 (o)1.âBeginning with the 2025 tax roll, a taxing authority 18 may elect, upon adoption of an ordinance or resolution approved 19 by a two-thirds vote of the governing body, not to exempt 20 property under sub-subparagraph (d)1.a. located in a county 21 specified pursuant to subparagraph 2., subject to the conditions 22 of this paragraph. 23 2.âA taxing authority must make a finding in the ordinance 24 or resolution that annual housing reports the most recently 25 published by the Shimberg Center for Housing Studies Annual 26 Report, prepared pursuant to s. 420.6075, identify identifies 27 that a county that is part of the jurisdiction of the taxing 28 authority is within a metropolitan statistical area or region 29 where, for each of the previous 3 years, the number of 30 affordable and available units in the metropolitan statistical 31 area or region is greater than the number of renter households 32 in the metropolitan statistical area or region for the category 33 entitled â0-120 percent AMI.â 34 3.âAn election made pursuant to this paragraph may apply 35 only to the ad valorem property tax levies imposed within a 36 county specified pursuant to subparagraph 2. by the taxing 37 authority making the election. 38 4.âThe ordinance or resolution must take effect on the 39 January 1 immediately succeeding adoption and shall expire on 40 the second January 1 after the January 1 in which the ordinance 41 or resolution takes effect. The ordinance or resolution may be 42 renewed prior to its expiration pursuant to this paragraph. 43 5.âThe taxing authority proposing to make an election under 44 this paragraph must advertise the ordinance or resolution or 45 renewal thereof pursuant to the requirements of s. 50.011(1) 46 prior to adoption. 47 6.âThe taxing authority must provide to the property 48 appraiser the adopted ordinance or resolution or renewal thereof 49 by the effective date of the ordinance or resolution or renewal 50 thereof. 51 7.âNotwithstanding an ordinance or resolution or renewal 52 thereof adopted pursuant to this paragraph, property in a 53 multifamily project that received an exemption pursuant to sub 54 subparagraph (d)1.a. before the adoption or renewal of such 55 ordinance or resolution may continue to receive such exemption 56 for each subsequent consecutive year that the same owner or each 57 successive owner applies for and is granted the exemption. 58 8.âNotwithstanding an ordinance or a resolution or a 59 renewal thereof adopted pursuant to this paragraph, the owner of 60 a property in a multifamily project that received a final site 61 plan approval within 1 year before the adoption of such 62 ordinance or resolution may apply for and be granted the 63 exemption under sub-subparagraph (d)1.a. after meeting the 64 requirements of this subsection and may continue to receive such 65 exemption for each subsequent consecutive year that the same 66 owner or each successive owner applies for and is granted the 67 exemption. 68 Section 2.âThe amendments made by this act to s. 196.1978, 69 Florida Statutes, first apply to the 2027 property tax roll. 70 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.